Oklahoma, session 2025, SB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3-8-101), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3-8-101. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the “Terry Peach North Canadian Watershed Water Restoration Act”.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3-8-102), is amended to read as
follows:

SB263 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Section 3-8-102. A. As used in the Terry Peach North Canadian
Watershed Water Restoration Act:
1. “Commission” means the Oklahoma Conservation Commission;
2. “Harmful woody species” means a tree or shrub species that
is rapidly encroaching into adjoining lands and is likely to cause
harm to the environment or economy. Harmful woody species include,
but are not limited to, Juniperus virginiana (Eastern Redcedar),
Juniperus scopulorum (Rocky Mountain juniper), Juniperus monosperma
(oneseed juniper) and, Tamarix ramosissima (salt cedar), Juniperus
pinchotii (redberry juniper), Juniper ashei (ashe juniper), and
Prosopis glandulosa (honey mesquite); and
3. “North Canadian Watershed” means the an area of land in
Oklahoma that drains or sheds water into the North Canadian River a
waterway or water basin.
B. There Subject to the availability of funds, there is hereby
created a statewide pilot program to remove or eradicate harmful
woody species in the North Canadian Watershed watersheds to be
administered by through the Oklahoma Conservation Commission. To
accomplish the goals listed in this section, the Commission is
authorized to use the funds available in the North Canadian
Watershed Water Restoration Revolving Fund established in Section 3
of this act 3-8-103 of this title. The purpose of the program is to
manage and eradicate, where possible, harmful woody species that
damage grazing lands, create significant wildfire risk, reduce
SB263 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

wild life habitat and reduce water flow into the North Canadian River
waterways and water basins.
C. In administering the pilot program, the Commission shall:
1. Cooperate with landowners, state agencies, and other
political subdivisions for removal of harmful woody species;
2. Measure the density of harmful woody species and estimate
water used by those species;
3. Create a study using a parallel watershed with no control of
harmful woody species;
4. Utilize available funds to cost-share with landowners,
recognized governmental entities, or not-for-profit organizations
for expenses incurred in the eradication of harmful woody species by
prescribed burn, biological controls, mechanical removal, or
herbicide applications;
5. Develop grant programs with conservation districts, rural
fire departments, and prescribe burn associations for resources
needed for prescribed burns, mechanical removal, biological control,
or herbicide applications on harmful woody species;
6. Bring attention to the problems posed by harmful woody
species to create awareness, demonstrate value to all stakeholders,
and encourage landowners to participate in the program; and
7. Have at least two three active project areas in the program,
consisting either of one above the Canton Lake dam and one below,

SB263 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

abov e Lake Overholser, and the North Fork Red River into Lugert-
Altus Reservoir.
D. The Commission is authorized to promulgate any rules and
procedures to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3-8-103), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3-8-103. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Conservation Commission to be
designated the “North Canadian Watershed Water Restoration Revolving
Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Conservation Commission from appropriations, federal grants or
funds, municipal contributions, private contributions, and any other
sources, including interest earned from the income in the fund, that
are designated for deposit to such fund or designated for duties
associated with harmful woody species removal from the North
Canadian Watershed watersheds throughout the state. All monies
accruing to the credit of said the fund are hereby appropriated and
may be budgeted and expended by the Conservation Commission to
perform the duties imposed on the Commission by law. Expenditures
from said the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the

SB263 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Dire ctor of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 04/16/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.



















SB263 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.